Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5101
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5101 to 44-5154 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurers Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 216, § 12.